Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.265

Report to governor and legislature.

The board shall transmit to the governor and to the legislature, as often as the governor may require it, a report of its work, in which shall be given such information as may be relevant.

[ 1999 c 143 s 30; 1977 c 75 s 5; 1955 c 340 s 11. Prior: 1945 c 155 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10249-8, part. Formerly RCW 43.67.040.]